Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.56.010

Laws relating to special service districts, application to code cities.

Except as otherwise provided in this title, state laws relating to special service or taxing districts shall apply to, grant powers, and impose duties upon code cities and their officers to the same extent as such laws apply to and affect other classes of cities and towns and their employees, including, without limitation, the following: (1) Chapter 70A.15 RCW, relating to air pollution control; (2) chapter 68.52 RCW, relating to cemetery districts; (3) chapter 29A.28 RCW, relating to congressional districts; (4) chapters 14.07 and 14.08 RCW, relating to municipal airport districts; (5) chapter 36.88 RCW, relating to county road improvement districts; (6) Title 85 RCW, relating to diking districts, drainage districts, and drainage improvement districts; (7) chapter 36.54 RCW, relating to county-owned ferries; (8) Title 52 RCW, relating to fire protection districts; (9) Title 86 RCW, relating to flood control districts and flood control; (10) chapter 70.46 RCW, relating to health districts; (11) chapters 87.03 through 87.84 and 89.12 RCW, relating to irrigation districts; (12) chapter 35.61 RCW, relating to metropolitan park districts; (13) chapter 35.58 RCW, relating to metropolitan municipalities; (14) chapter 17.28 RCW, relating to mosquito control districts; (15) chapter 17.12 RCW, relating to agricultural pest districts; (16) Title 53 RCW, relating to port districts; (17) chapter 70.44 RCW, relating to public hospital districts; (18) Title 54 RCW, relating to public utility districts; (19) chapter 91.08 RCW, relating to public waterway districts; (20) chapter 89.12 RCW, relating to reclamation districts; (21) chapters 57.02 through 57.36 RCW, relating to water-sewer districts; and (22) chapter 17.04 RCW, relating to weed districts.

[ 2021 c 65 s 24; 2015 c 53 s 59; 1996 c 230 s 1605; 1987 c 331 s 79; 1979 ex.s. c 30 s 2; 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.56.010.]

NOTES:

Explanatory statement—2021 c 65: See note following RCW 53.54.030.

Part headings not law—Effective date—1996 c 230: See notes following RCW 57.02.001.

Effective date—1987 c 331: See RCW 68.05.900.